California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions to the Franchise Tax Board on or before the first day of March of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 806.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 814 of Ch. 1064.)
-------------------------------------------

24372.3.

(a) Section 169 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amortization of pollution control facilities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The deduction allowed by this section shall be available only with respect to facilities located in this state.

(c) The “state certifying authority,” as defined in Section 169(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, means the State Air Resources Board, in the
 case of air pollution, and the State Water Resources Control Board, in the case of water pollution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 51.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24372.5.

(a) Section 194 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amortization of reforestation expenditures, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The deduction allowed by this section shall be available only with respect to qualified timber property located in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 88.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24373.

Section 178 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the amortization of cost of acquiring a lease, shall apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 111.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

24377.

(a) A taxpayer engaged in the business of farming may elect to treat as expenses which are not chargeable to capital account expenditures (otherwise chargeable to capital account) which are paid or incurred by it during the taxable year for the purchase or acquisition of fertilizer, lime, ground limestone, marl, or other materials to enrich, neutralize, or condition land used in farming, or for the application of such materials to such land. The expenditures so treated shall be allowed as a deduction.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the term “land used in farming” means land used (before or simultaneously with the expenditures described in subdivision (a)) by the taxpayer or its tenant for the production of crops, fruits, or other agricultural products or for the sustenance of livestock. 

(c) The election under subdivision (a) for any taxable year shall be made within the time prescribed by law (including extensions thereof) for filing the return for that taxable year. The election shall be made in the form and manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe. The election may not be revoked except with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 152.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24379.

Section 83 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to property transferred in connection with performance of services, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 52.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24382.

(a) Section 216 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deduction of taxes, interest, and business depreciation by cooperative housing corporation tenant-stockholder, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 6282(b) of Public Law 100-647, relating to the effective date for distributions by cooperative housing corporations, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 53.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24383.

(a) Every taxpayer, at the election of the taxpayer, shall be entitled to a deduction of the cost of repairing or remodeling any building, facility or transportation vehicle owned or leased by the taxpayer at the time of such repairing or remodeling, in order to permit handicapped or elderly individuals to enter or leave such building, facility or transportation vehicle, to increase the access handicapped or elderly individuals would have to such building, facility or transportation vehicle, or to allow handicapped or elderly
 individuals more effective use of the building, facility or transportation vehicle, provided that the repair or remodeling meets one or more standards established pursuant to Section 4450 or 4451 of the Government Code. In the absence of such state standards, those standards established by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States with the concurrence of the Architectural and Transportation Barriers Compliance Board shall be used. The installation of emergency egress/safe area refuge systems shall be eligible for such deductions.

(b) The deduction authorized by this section shall be taken with respect to the taxable year in which such repairing or remodeling is completed.

(c) The deduction provided by this section with respect to any taxable year shall be in lieu of any deduction with respect to such repairing or remodeling relating to exhaustion, wear and tear or
 obsolescence. If, however, the costs of that repair or remodeling exceed the limit set forth in subdivision (g), the remaining balance may be charged to capital account. 

(d) If any building, facility or transportation vehicle is owned by more than one person, a taxpayer may deduct a portion of the costs of such repairing or remodeling apportionate to the interest in such building, facility or transportation vehicle which is owned by the taxpayer. 

(e) For purposes of this section, “building, facility or transportation vehicle” means a building, facility or transportation vehicle, or part thereof, which is intended to be used, and is actually used, by the taxpayer or the general public, in the taxpayer’s business or trade.

(f) For purposes of this section, “handicapped individual” means any individual who has a
 physical or mental disability (including, but not limited to, blindness or deafness) which for such individual constitutes or results in a functional limitation to employment, or who has any physical or mental impairment (including, but not limited to, a sight or hearing impairment) which substantially limits one or more major life activities of such individual, and “elderly individual” means an individual who is 65 years of age or older. 

(g) The deduction authorized by this section shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) with respect to any taxpayer for any taxable year.

(h) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. 

(i) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1976.

(j) (1) The State Fire Marshal in cooperation with the Department of Rehabilitation and the Department of Aging shall adopt building standards and regulations for emergency egress/safe area refuge systems. The building standards and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, minimum requirements for safety, reliability, durability and usability. Emergency egress/safe area refuge systems that comply with the building standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be eligible for the deduction provided by this section.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section and the building standards adopted pursuant to this section do not supersede more restrictive building standards and regulations adopted by the state and local governments. 

(k) “Emergency egress/safe
 area refuge system” shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A building floor divided into not less than two compartments by not less than one-hour fire-resistive construction. Each door opening in the construction shall be protected by a twenty minute fire-resistive assembly as defined in regulations of the State Fire Marshal. Duct openings shall be protected by single-blade or curtain-type fire dampers to restrict the passage of smoke or flame. The smaller of the compartmental areas shall be not less than one-fourth the floor area of the story. Each such compartment shall contain a stairway or elevator or other means of ready egress from the building. 

(2) A fire alarm system defined in regulations by the State Fire Marshal. 

(3) Use of existing exiting systems and warning devices when
 practical, including, but not limited to, stairways, elevators, and fire alarms.

(4) Accommodations for wheelchairs and all attached wheelchair equipment, as well as wheelchair occupants.

(5) Its own power source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 153.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Special Deductions [24401. - 24416.24.]

24401.

In addition to the deductions provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 24341), there shall be allowed as deductions in computing taxable income the items specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

24402.

(a) A portion of the dividends received during the taxable year declared from income which has been included in the measure of the taxes imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 23400), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) upon the taxpayer declaring the dividends.

(b) The portion of dividends which may be deducted under this section shall be as follows:

(1) In the case of any dividend described in subdivision (a), received from a “more than 50 percent owned corporation,” 100 percent.

(2) In the case of any dividend described in subdivision (a), received from a “20 percent owned corporation,” 80 percent.

(3) In the case of any dividend described in subdivision (a), received from a corporation that is less than 20 percent owned, 70 percent.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “more than 50 percent owned corporation” means any corporation if more than 50 percent of the stock of that corporation (by vote and value) is owned by the taxpayer. For purposes of the preceding sentence, stock described in Section 1504(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be taken into account.

(2) The term “20 percent owned corporation” means any corporation if 20 percent or more of the stock of that corporation (by vote and value) is owned by the taxpayer. For purposes of the preceding sentence, stock described in Section 1504(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be taken into account.

(d) (1) No deduction shall be allowed under this section in respect of any dividend on any share of stock:

(A) which is held by the taxpayer for 45 days or less during the 90-day period beginning on the date which is 45 days before the date on which the share becomes ex-dividend with respect to that dividend, or

(B) to the extent that the taxpayer is under an obligation (whether pursuant to a short sale or otherwise) to make related
 payments with respect to positions in substantially similar or related property.

(2) In the case of stock having preference in dividends, if the taxpayer receives dividends with respect to that stock which are attributable to a period or periods aggregating in excess of 366 days, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be applied as follows:

(A) By substituting “90 days” for “45 days” in each place it appears.

(B) By substituting “180-day period” for “90-day period.”

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, in determining the period for which the taxpayer has held any share of stock:

(A) the day of disposition, but not the day of acquisition, shall be taken into account, and

(B) Section 1223(4) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(4) Section 246(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the holding period reduced for periods where risk of loss diminished, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(e) (1) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to dividends received or accrued after the 30th day after the date of the enactment of the act adding this subdivision.

(2) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to dividends received or accrued during the two-year period beginning on the date of the enactment of the act adding this subdivision if:

(A) the dividend is paid
 with respect to stock held by the taxpayer on January 1, 1998 and all times thereafter until the dividend is received,

(B) that stock is continuously subject to a position described in Section 246(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code on January 1, 1998, and all times thereafter until the dividend is received, and

(C) that stock and position are clearly identified in the taxpayer’s records within 30 days after the date of the enactment of the act adding this subdivision.

(3) Stock shall not be treated as meeting the requirement of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) if the position is sold, closed, or otherwise terminated and reestablished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24403.

In the case of a building and loan association, organized and operating wholly or partly on a mutual plan, or a federal savings and loan association, organized and operating wholly or partly on a mutual plan, the return paid or credited on or apportioned to their withdrawable shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24404.

In the case of farmers, fruit growers, or like associations organized and operated in whole or in part on a cooperative or mutual basis, (a) for the purpose of marketing the products of members or other producers, and turning back to them the proceeds of sales, less the necessary marketing expenses, which may include reasonable reserves, on the basis of either the quantity or the value of the products furnished by them, or (b) for the purpose of purchasing, or producing, supplies and equipment for the use of
 members or other persons, and turning over such supplies and equipment to them at actual cost, plus necessary expenses, all income resulting from or arising out of such business activities for or with their members carried on by them or their agents; or when done on a nonprofit basis for or with nonmembers.

For the purposes of this section “all income resulting from or arising out of such business activities for or with their members” shall include all amounts, whether or not derived from patronage, allocated to members during the taxable year. Amounts allocated include cash, merchandise, capital stock, revolving fund certificates, certificates of indebtedness, retain certificates, letters of advice, or written instruments which in some other manner disclose to each member the dollar amount allocated to him. Allocations made after the close of the taxable year and on or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month following the close of such year shall be considered
 as made on the last day of such taxable year to the extent the allocations are attributable to income derived before the close of such year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 155.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24405.

(a) In the case of other associations organized and operated in whole or in part on a cooperative or a mutual basis, all income resulting from or arising out of business activities for or with their members carried on by them or their agents, or when done on a nonprofit basis for or with nonmembers, shall be an allowable deduction. However, the deduction allowable under this section shall not apply to those cooperative or mutual associations whose income is principally derived from the sale in the regular course of business of tangible
 personal property other than water, agricultural products, or food sold at wholesale. 

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), “food sold at wholesale” means a sale of food to anyone engaged in the business of selling food who holds a seller’s permit issued pursuant to Section 6066, and who at the time of purchasing the food either:

(1) Intends to sell it in the regular course of business.

(2) Is unable to ascertain at the time of purchase whether the food will be sold or used for some other purpose.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (a), a credit union’s activities are “for or with” the members of the credit union if the activities involve the investment of surplus member savings capital in investments permitted for credit unions pursuant to
 Sections 14406, 14652, 14653, 14653.5, 14654, 14655, and 14656 of the Financial Code. “Surplus member savings capital” means the savings capital of credit union members which is in excess of the amount of savings capital which is loaned to members of the credit union. The term “savings capital” shall have the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 14400 of the Financial Code.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), “income resulting from or arising out of business activities for or with their members” includes, but is not limited to, all income resulting from reciprocal transactions with member credit unions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1121, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24406.

In the case of other associations organized and operated as co-operative corporations pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200), Division 3, Title 1 of the Corporations Code, whose income is principally derived from the sale in the regular course of business of tangible personal property other than water, agricultural products or food sold at wholesale, all patronage refunds paid or accrued to patrons if the patronage refunds are made and allocated as follows:

(a) Made pursuant to a pre-existing obligation which is created by the association’s bylaws or
 other written instrument.

(b) Made from earnings which are attributable to business done by the association with the patrons to whom the patronage refunds are made, and allocated ratably according to patronage.

(c) Allocated, and the patrons to whom the patronage refunds are to be made are notified of the allocation, on or before the due date for the filing of the association’s franchise tax return, including any extension of time, pursuant to this part, for the year in which the patronage occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1934.)
-------------------------------------------

24406.5.

(a) In the case of gas producers’ cooperative associations organized and operated as cooperative corporations pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3001) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, whose income is principally derived from the sale in the regular course of business of tangible personal property other than water, agricultural products or food sold at wholesale, all patronage refunds paid or accrued to patrons if the patronage refunds are made and allocated as follows:

(1) Made pursuant to
 a preexisting obligation which is created by the association’s bylaws or other written instrument.

(2) Made from earnings which are attributable to business done by the association with the patrons to whom the patronage refunds are made, and allocated ratably according to patronage.

(3) Allocated, and the patrons to whom the patronage refunds are to be made are notified of the allocation, on or before the due date for the filing of the association’s franchise tax return, including any extension of time, pursuant to this part, for the year in which the patronage occurred.

(b) Each cooperative corporation shall certify to the Franchise Tax Board its eligibility for the deduction provided by this section. Certification shall be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board in forms or
 instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 349, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24406.6.

For purposes of Section 24373.5, and Sections 24404 to 24406.5, inclusive, net earnings shall not be reduced by amounts paid during the year as dividends on capital stock or other proprietary capital interests of the organization to the extent that the articles of incorporation, bylaws of the organization, or other contract with patrons provide that those dividends are in addition to amounts otherwise payable to patrons that are derived from business done for or with patrons during the taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 65.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24407.

(a) The organizational expenditures of a corporation may, at the election of the corporation (made in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board), be treated as deferred expenses. In computing net income, the deferred expenses remaining, if any, after the application of subdivision (b) shall be allowed as a deduction ratably over that period of not less than 180 months as may be selected by the corporation (beginning with the month in which the corporation begins business).

(b) (1) The corporation shall be allowed a deduction for the deferred expenses under subdivision (a) in an amount equal to the lesser of either of the following:

(A) The amount of organizational expenditures of the taxpayer that are treated as deferred expenses under subdivision (a).

(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000), reduced, but not below zero, by an amount equal to the excess of the amount of the taxpayer’s organizational expenditures treated as deferred expenses under subdivision (a) over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) The deduction under paragraph (1) shall be allowed in the taxable year in which the first month of the period specified in subdivision (a) occurs.

(c) The
 amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to amounts paid or incurred on or after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 66.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24408.

The term “organizational expenditures” means any expenditure that meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Is incident to the creation of the corporation.

(b) Is chargeable to capital account.

(c) Is of a character which, if expended incident to the creation of a corporation having a limited life, would be amortizable over that life.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24409.

The election provided by Section 24407 may be made for any taxable year beginning after December 31, 1960, but only if made not later than the time prescribed by law for filing the return for that taxable year (including extensions thereof). The period so elected shall be adhered to in computing the income of the corporation for the taxable year for which the election is made and all subsequent taxable years. The election shall apply only with respect to the expenditures paid or incurred on or after June 23, 1961.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24410.

(a) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2004, the allowable dividends received deduction with respect to qualified dividends received by a corporation during the taxable year from a corporation that is an insurer within the meaning of Section 28 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, whether or not the insurer is engaged in business in California, if at the time of each dividend payment at least 80 percent of each class of the stock of the insurer was owned, directly or indirectly, by the corporation receiving the
 dividend shall equal the percentage specified in paragraph (1) of the amount of the qualified dividends received.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, the percentage is equal to:

(A) Eighty percent for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004, and before January 1, 2008.

(B) Eighty-five percent for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and thereafter.

(b) (1) For all taxable years ending on or after December 1, 1997, and commencing before January 1, 2004, a taxpayer may elect to determine its deduction under this section for dividends received by the taxpayer (or the members of the taxpayer’s commonly controlled group, if any) during each taxable year from a corporation that is an insurer within the
 meaning of Section 28 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, whether or not the insurer is engaged in business in California, in an amount equal to 80 percent of the qualified dividends received, if at the time of each dividend payment at least 80 percent of each class of stock of the insurer was owned, directly or indirectly, by the corporation receiving the dividend.

(2) A taxpayer shall make the election under this subdivision by timely filing a return for at least one taxable year ending on or after December 1, 1997, and commencing before January 1, 2004, expressly electing to be subject to the dividends received deduction in accordance with the percentage set forth in paragraph (1), and reporting and remitting any amounts due pursuant to that election.

(3) A return is timely filed for purposes of paragraph (2) if it is filed within 180 days of the effective date of
 the act adding this section.

(4) By making the election pursuant to this subdivision, the taxpayer agrees to all of the following:

(A) To be subject to the dividends received deduction in accordance with the percentage set forth in paragraph (1) for all taxable years ending on or after December 1, 1997, and commencing before January 1, 2004, for which the Franchise Tax Board may propose an assessment or allow a claim for refund, or in which the final determination of tax for the taxable year has not been made because of a dispute related to the dividends received deduction or the application of Section 24425 to any expense related to that dividends received deduction.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), to file a return (or amended return) and remit any amounts due pursuant to the
 election for all taxable years ending on or after December 1, 1997, and commencing before January 1, 2004, for which the Franchise Tax Board may propose an assessment or allow a claim for refund, within 180 days of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(ii) In the case of a taxable year for which the due date of the return is more than 180 days after the effective date of the act adding this section, to file the return and remit any amounts due pursuant to the election under this subdivision on or before the due date of the return.

(5) For purposes of determining taxable income on the return (or amended returns) filed pursuant to the election set forth in paragraph (1), Section 24425 does not apply to the amount of the dividends received deduction.

(6) The election is irrevocable. With respect to
 electing taxpayers, no refund, credit, or offset may be allowed for a deduction for dividends received from an insurance company in excess of the amounts allowed under this subdivision for taxable years ending on or after December 1, 1997, and beginning before January 1, 2004.

(c) For purposes of determining the allowable dividend received deduction under this section, a qualified dividend received during the taxable year means a dividend received by the taxpayer during the taxable year multiplied by the percentage prescribed under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subdivision, as the case may be.

(1) If the ratio of the five-year average net written premiums for all insurance companies in a commonly controlled group to the five-year average total income for all insurance companies in the commonly controlled group for the taxable year is greater than or equal to the applicable
 percentage, then the percentage under this subdivision shall be 100 percent.

(2) If the ratio of the five-year average net written premiums for all insurance companies in a commonly controlled group to the five-year average total income for all insurance companies in the commonly controlled group for the taxable year is less than the applicable percentage and greater than 10 percent, then the percentage under this subdivision shall be equal to the following fraction, expressed as a percentage:

(A) The numerator is the five-year average net written premiums for the taxable year.

(B) The denominator is the applicable percentage times the five-year average total income for that taxable year.

(3) If the ratio of the five-year average net written premiums
 for all insurance companies in a commonly controlled group to the five-year average total income for all insurance companies in the commonly controlled group for the taxable year is equal to or less than 10 percent, the percentage under this subdivision shall be zero.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) The “five-year average” means the aggregate net written premiums or total income, as the case may be, over the five immediately preceding calendar or fiscal years, divided by five. For purposes of this computation, if an insurance company in the commonly controlled group has been in existence for fewer than five years, its aggregate net written premiums and total income shall each be multiplied by five and divided by the number of years of its existence. If an insurance company does not have a regulatory filing requirement, the period covered shall be the fiscal year used for
 the insurance company’s financial statements. The use of either the calendar year or fiscal year, as the case may be, for determination of the five-year average shall, for the first taxable year in which it is computed, be treated as an accounting method under this part and may thereafter only be changed with the written consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2008, the applicable percentage shall be 60 percent. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, the applicable percentage shall be 70 percent.

(d) The following rules apply with respect to the application of this section to dividends received from an insurance company that insures risks of a member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group.

(1) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), for purposes of
 determining the amount of the deduction authorized by subdivisions (a) and (b), no deduction is allowed for dividends attributable to premiums received or accrued by the insurance company from a member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group. For purposes of this paragraph, dividends attributable to premiums received or accrued from a member of a commonly controlled group is equal to total dividends received multiplied by the greater of either of the following:

(A) The ratio of net written premiums from a member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group divided by total net written premiums.

(B) (i) For a property casualty insurer, the ratio of the underwriting risk associated with a member of the commonly controlled group’s insurance contracts to the insurance company’s total underwriting risks for all insurance contracts. The
 underwriting risk is the underwriting risk reserves (losses plus expense risk-based capital after discount) as calculated using the “RBC Instructions.”

(ii) For a life insurer, the ratio of aggregate reserves for life, accident, and health contracts plus liability for deposit type contracts plus contract claims held for policies issued to members of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group divided by total aggregate reserves for life, accident, and health contracts plus liability for deposit type contracts plus contract claims.

(2) Net written premiums do not include premiums received or accrued from another member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group. Premiums from another member of the commonly controlled group is the greater of either of the following:

(A) Net written premiums from a
 member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group.

(B) (i) For a property casualty insurer, the net written premiums received or accrued by the insurance company multiplied by the ratio of the underwriting risk associated with the member of the commonly controlled group’s insurance contracts to the insurance company’s total underwriting risks for all insurance contracts. The underwriting risk is the underwriting risk reserves (loss plus expense risk-based capital after discount) as calculated using the “RBC Instructions.”

(ii) For a life insurer, net written premiums received or accrued by the insurance company multiplied by the ratio of aggregate reserves for life, accident, and health contracts plus liability for deposit type contracts plus contract claims held for policies issued to members of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group
 divided by total aggregate reserves for life, accident, and health contracts plus liability for deposit type contracts plus contract claims.

(3) For purposes of this section, investment income shall be limited to that portion of investment income equal to the ratio of net written premiums (determined under paragraph (2)) to total net written premiums (determined without regard to paragraph (2)).

(4) For purposes of the limitations described in this subdivision, premiums received or accrued from a member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group does not include premiums where the direct insurance risks ceded by affiliates and assumed by the insurance company originated with a person that is not a member of the insurance company’s commonly controlled group.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Net written premiums” means direct written premiums plus premiums from reinsurance assumed, less premiums ceded to a reinsurance company, as would be required to be reported in an insurer’s Statutory Annual Statement in accordance with the Annual Statement Instructions and Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Net written premiums from life insurance contracts shall be determined by multiplying the net written premiums received, assumed, or ceded by 1.3. Net written premiums from financial guaranty insurance contracts shall be determined by multiplying the net written premiums received, assumed, or ceded by the lesser of 2.3 or an amount that would cause the ratio of the five-year average net written premiums for all financial guaranty insurance companies in the commonly controlled group to the five-year average total income for all financial guaranty insurance companies
 in the commonly controlled group to be equal to the applicable percentage. Paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) applies for purposes of the preceding sentence.

(A) “Direct written premiums” means amounts written by an insurance company in consideration for insurance and annuity contracts issued to policyholders.

(B) “Premiums from reinsurance assumed” means amounts received or accrued by an insurance company in consideration for liabilities it assumes from another insurance company.

(C) “Premiums ceded” means insurance premiums paid or accrued by an insurance company to a reinsurer to support the liabilities assumed by the reinsurer.

(2) “Total income” means net written premiums plus investment income.

(3) “Investment income” means an insurance company’s earnings from its investment portfolio, including interest, dividends, realized gains (or losses), and rent, as would be required to be reported in an insurer’s Statutory Annual Statement in accordance with the Annual Statement Instructions and Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, except as otherwise provided.

(A) Except for reinsurance transactions, realized gains (or losses) do not include losses incurred in transactions with a person that is a member of the taxpayer’s or the insurance company’s commonly controlled group.

(B) Investment income does not include dividends from a person that is a member of the commonly controlled group. Intercompany dividends that have been eliminated from investment income as would be required to be reported
 in the Statutory Annual Statement in accordance with the Annual Statement Instructions and Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall not again be eliminated for this purpose.

(C) Investment income does not include income included in the taxpayer’s combined report filed in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of this part.

(4) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2004, the “RBC Instructions” as defined in Section 739 of the Insurance Code means the Risk Based Capital Instructions and Report as promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, as it read on January 1, 2004. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004, the “RBC Instructions” as defined in Section 739 of the Insurance Code means the Risk Based Capital Instructions and Report as
 promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or any substantially equivalent successor instructions and report, as it read on January 1 of the year in which the taxpayer’s taxable year begins.

(5) The phrase “commonly controlled group” shall have the same meaning as that phrase has under Section 25105.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe those regulations that may be necessary to provide for the following:

(1) Establishment of a comparable weighting factor as described in paragraph 1 of subdivision (e) for new lines of insurance not described in the act adding this subdivision.

(2) For purposes of determining the applicable ratios described in subdivisions (c) and (d), the inclusion or exclusion of items of investment income
 to eliminate the effects of devices designed to manipulate those ratios for purposes of avoiding the tax imposed under this part.

(3) For purposes of determining the applicable ratios described in subdivisions (c) and (d), the inclusion or exclusion of items of investment income to prevent distortion causing significant reduction in those ratios.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 868, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

24411.

(a) For purposes of those taxpayers electing to compute income under Section 25110, 100 percent of the qualifying dividends described in subdivision (c) and 75 percent of other qualifying dividends to the extent not otherwise allowed as a deduction or eliminated from income. “Qualifying dividends” means those received by the water’s-edge group from corporations if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The average of the property, payroll, and sales factors
 within the United States for the corporation is less than 20 percent.

(2) More than 50 percent of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote is owned directly or indirectly by the water’s-edge group.

(b) The water’s-edge group consists of corporations whose income and apportionment factors are taken into account pursuant to Section 25110.

(c) Dividends derived from a construction project, the location of which is not subject to the taxpayer’s control.

For purposes of this subdivision:

(1) “Construction project” means any activity which meets the following requirements:

(A) Is undertaken for any entity, including a
 governmental entity, which is not affiliated with the taxpayer.
